Massachusetts, session 194th, H1216.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 23 of chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the second paragraph and inserting in place 
thereof the following paragraph:-- 
The commission shall provide to any active or retired employee of the 
commonwealth and to any child, who is under 26 years of age or without regard to age if such 
child is incapable of self-sustaining employment due to disability, of any active or retired 
employee of the commonwealth and who is insured under the group insurance commission, 
coverage for hearing aids, as defined in section 196 of chapter 112. Coverage under this section 
shall include all related services prescribed by a health care professional or a licensed audiologist 
or hearing instrument specialist, as defined in said section 196 of said chapter 112, including the 

of 6 11 initial hearing aid examination or evaluation, fitting and adjustments and supplies, including ear 
molds. Alternatively, if the insured is 18 years of age or older, no examination, evaluation or 
prescription shall be required for coverage for hearing aids. The benefits in this section shall not 
be subject to any greater deductible, coinsurance, copayments or out-of-pocket limits than other 
benefits provided by the insurer. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the commission from 
offering greater coverage for hearing aids than required by this section. This section shall also 
require coverage for such hearing aids under any non-group policy. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after section 10Q the following section:- 
Section 10R. The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health 
maintenance organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators 
under contract to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall 
provide coverage for hearing aids, as defined in section 196 of chapter 112. Coverage under this 
section shall include all related services prescribed by a health care professional or a licensed 
audiologist or hearing instrument specialist, as defined in said section 196 of said chapter 112, 
including the initial hearing aid examination or evaluation, fitting and adjustments and supplies, 
including ear molds. Alternatively, if the insured is 18 years of age or older, no examination, 
evaluation or prescription shall be required for coverage for hearing aids. 
SECTION 3. Section 47X of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing is hereby 
amended by striking out the second paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following 
paragraph:- 

of 6 32               Any policy of accident and sickness insurance as described in section 108 
which provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance and which is delivered, issued 
or subsequently renewed by agreement between the insurer and policyholder in the 
commonwealth; any blanket or general policy of insurance described in subdivision (A), (C) or 
(D) of section 110 that provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance and that is 
delivered, issued or subsequently renewed by agreement between the insurer and the 
policyholder, within or without the commonwealth; or any employees' health and welfare fund 
that provides hospital expense and surgical expense benefits and that is delivered, issued or 
renewed to any person or group of people in the commonwealth, shall provide coverage for 
hearing aids, as defined in section 196 of chapter 112 to the insured and to any child of the 
insured who is under 26 years of age or without regard to age if such child is incapable of self-
sustaining employment due to disability. Coverage under this section shall include all related 
services prescribed by a health care professional or a licensed audiologist or hearing instrument 
specialist, as defined in said section 196 of said chapter 112, including the initial hearing aid 
examination or evaluation, fitting and adjustments and supplies, including ear molds. 
Alternatively, if the insured is 18 years of age or older, no examination, evaluation or 
prescription shall be required for coverage for hearing aids. The benefits in this section shall not 
be subject to any greater deductible, coinsurance, copayments or out-of-pocket limits than any 
other benefits provided by the insurer. Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from 
offering greater coverage for hearing aids than required by this section. This section shall also 
require coverage for hearing aids under any non-group policy. 

of 6 53  SECTION 4. Section 8Y of chapter 176A of the General Laws, as so appearing is hereby 
amended by striking out the second paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following 
paragraph:- 
Any contracts, except contracts providing supplemental coverage to 
Medicare or other governmental programs, between a subscriber and the corporation under an 
individual or group hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed in the 
commonwealth shall provide coverage for hearing aids, as defined in section 196 of chapter 112 
to all individual subscribers or members within the commonwealth and to all group members 
having a principal place of employment in the commonwealth and to any child of such person 
who is under 26 years of age or without regard to age if such child is incapable of self-sustaining 
employment due to disability. Coverage under this section shall include all related services 
prescribed by a health care professional or a licensed audiologist or hearing instrument specialist, 
as defined in said section 196 of said chapter 112, including the initial hearing aid examination 
or evaluation, fitting and adjustments and supplies, including ear molds. Alternatively, if the 
insured is 18 years of age or older, no examination, evaluation or prescription shall be required 
for coverage for hearing aids. The benefits in this section shall not be subject to any greater 
deductible, coinsurance, copayments or out-of-pocket limits than any other benefits provided by 
the insurer. Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from offering greater coverage for 
hearing aids than required by this section. This section shall also require coverage for hearing 
aids under any non-group policy. 
SECTION 5. Chapter 176B of the General Laws, as so appearing is hereby amended by 
striking out section 4EE and inserting in place thereof the following section:- 

of 6 75  Section 4EE. Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service 
agreement, except certificates which provide supplemental coverage to Medicare or other 
governmental programs, that shall be delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth 
shall provide coverage for hearing aids, as defined in section 196 of chapter 112 to all individual 
subscribers or members within the commonwealth and to all group members having a principal 
place of employment in the commonwealth and to any child of such person who is under 26 
years of age or without regard to age if such child is incapable of self-sustaining employment due 
to disability. Coverage under this section shall include all related services prescribed by a health 
care professional or a licensed audiologist or hearing instrument specialist, as defined in said 
section 196 of said chapter 112, including the initial hearing aid examination or evaluation, 
fitting and adjustments and supplies, including ear molds. Alternatively, if the insured is 18 years 
of age or older, no examination, evaluation or prescription shall be required for coverage for 
hearing aids. The benefits in this section shall not be subject to any greater deductible, 
coinsurance, copayments or out-of-pocket limits than any other benefits provided by the insurer. 
Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from offering greater coverage for hearing aids 
than required by this section. This section shall also require coverage for hearing aids under any 
non-group policy. 
SECTION 6. Section 4N of chapter 176G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by striking out the second paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following 
paragraph:- 
An individual or group health maintenance contract, except contracts providing 
supplemental coverage to Medicare or other governmental programs, shall provide coverage for 
hearing aids, as defined in section 196 of chapter 112 to the insured and to any child of the 

of 6 98 insured who is under 26 years of age or without regard to age if such child is incapable of self-
sustaining employment due to disability. Coverage under this section shall include all related 
100 services prescribed by a health care professional or a licensed audiologist or hearing instrument 
101 specialist, as defined in said section 196 of said chapter 112, including the initial hearing aid 
102 examination or evaluation, fitting and adjustments and supplies, including ear molds. 
103 Alternatively, if the insured is 18 years of age or older, no examination, evaluation or 
104 prescription shall be required for coverage for hearing aids. The benefits in this section shall not 
105 be subject to any greater deductible, coinsurance, copayments or out-of-pocket limits than any 
106 other benefits provided by the insurer. Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from 
107 offering greater coverage for hearing aids than required by this section. This section shall also 
108 require coverage for hearing aids under any non-group policy.